apertium-hye.hye.dix
    <pardef n="մատենագ/իր__n_aa">
      <e><p>          <l>րից</l><r>իր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>րի</l><r>իր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>րին</l><r>իր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>րով</l><r>իր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իր</l><r>իր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իրը</l><r>իր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իրն</l><r>իր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իրներից</l><r>իր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իրների</l><r>իր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իրներին</l><r>իր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իրներով</l><r>իր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իրներ</l><r>իր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իրները</l><r>իր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իրներն</l><r>իր<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="շ/իշ__n_nn">
      <e><p>          <l>շից</l><r>իշ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>շի</l><r>իշ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>շին</l><r>իշ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>շում</l><r>իշ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>շով</l><r>իշ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իշ</l><r>իշ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իշը</l><r>իշ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իշն</l><r>իշ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>շերից</l><r>իշ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>շերի</l><r>իշ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>շերին</l><r>իշ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>շերում</l><r>իշ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>շերով</l><r>իշ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>շեր</l><r>իշ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>շերը</l><r>իշ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>շերն</l><r>իշ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="դ/ունչ__n_nn">
      <e><p>          <l>նչից</l><r>ունչ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նչի</l><r>ունչ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նչին</l><r>ունչ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նչում</l><r>ունչ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նչով</l><r>ունչ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ունչ</l><r>ունչ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ունչը</l><r>ունչ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ունչն</l><r>ունչ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նչերից</l><r>ունչ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նչերի</l><r>ունչ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նչերին</l><r>ունչ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նչերում</l><r>ունչ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նչերով</l><r>ունչ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նչեր</l><r>ունչ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նչերը</l><r>ունչ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նչերն</l><r>ունչ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="խ/ուրձ__n_nn">
      <e><p>          <l>րձից</l><r>ուրձ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>րձի</l><r>ուրձ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>րձին</l><r>ուրձ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>րձում</l><r>ուրձ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>րձով</l><r>ուրձ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ուրձ</l><r>ուրձ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ուրձը</l><r>ուրձ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ուրձն</l><r>ուրձ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>րձերից</l><r>ուրձ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>րձերի</l><r>ուրձ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>րձերին</l><r>ուրձ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>րձերում</l><r>ուրձ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>րձերով</l><r>ուրձ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>րձեր</l><r>ուրձ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>րձերը</l><r>ուրձ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>րձերն</l><r>ուրձ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="աստվածաշունչ"><i>աստվածաշ</i><par n="դ/ունչ__n_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="խուրձ"><i>խ</i><par n="խ/ուրձ__n_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="դունչ"><i>դ</i><par n="դ/ունչ__n_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="ունկնդիր"><i>ունկնդ</i><par n="մատենագ/իր__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="շունչ"><i>շ</i><par n="դ/ունչ__n_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="շիշ"><i>շ</i><par n="շ/իշ__n_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="խաչակիր"><i>խաչակ</i><par n="մատենագ/իր__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="մատենագիր"><i>մատենագ</i><par n="մատենագ/իր__n_aa"/></e>
